District of Columbia statutes.
1-1313

Orders regulating platting and subdividing; admission of plats and subdivisions to record.

The Council of the District of Columbia is authorized and directed to make and publish such general orders as may be necessary to regulate the platting and subdividing of all lands and grounds in the District of Columbia under the jurisdiction of the Mayor; and no such plat or subdivision made in pursuance of such orders shall be admitted to record in the Office of the Surveyor of said District without an order to that effect indorsed thereon by the Mayor of said District.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1427, ch. 854, § 1601

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-1314 and § 1-1321.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-913.
1973 Ed., § 1-613.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(21) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.